Alabama, session 2026rs, SB379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the City of Owens Cross Roads in Madison County are altered,
rearranged, and extended to include within the corporate
limits of the municipality, in addition to the lands now
included, all of the following territory:
Parcel 22-09-32-0-001-034.000
SEC 32 T5 R2E COMM NW COR OF SD SEC S 1201.37 FT TO POB
TH N87E 453.77 FT TH S1E 135.38 FT TH S86W 458 FT TH N TO POB
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of Owens
Cross Roads is on file and open to public inspection in the
Office of the Judge of Probate in Madison County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB379 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB379
Senate 02-Apr-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Kitchens
Page 2